Washington statutes.
RCW 27.24.062

Establishment of regional law libraries.

Two or more counties each with a population of from eight thousand to less than one hundred twenty-five thousand at the time of creation of the regional law library may, by agreement of the respective law library boards of trustees as described in RCW 27.24.020(2), create a regional law library and establish and maintain one principal law library at such location as the regional board of trustees may determine will best suit the needs of the users: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That there shall be at all times a law library in such size as the board of trustees may determine necessary to be located at the courthouse where each superior court is located.

[ 2005 c 63 s 1; 1992 c 62 s 4; 1991 c 363 s 18; 1971 ex.s. c 141 s 1; 1943 c 195 s 1; 1933 c 167 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 94 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8254-1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.